Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.080

Applications for licensure and examinations—Fees.

(1) Application for licensure shall be filed with the board as provided by rule.

(2) The application for examination shall be filed with the board as prescribed by rule.

(3) The application and examination fees shall be determined by the director under RCW 43.24.086.

[ 2009 c 370 s 8; 1993 c 35 s 2; 1985 c 7 s 74; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 85; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.